Oklahoma, session 2025, SB916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 128 of Title 60, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this section:


1. “AFIDA” means the Agricultral Foreign Investment Disclosure


Act of 1978, 42 U.S.C., Part 3501 et seq;

Req. No. 1078 Page 1


2. “Agricultural land” means real property in this state used


or zoned in a manner that would permit the use of the property for


an agricultural operation;


3. “Agricultural operation” means any operation devoted to the


bona fide production of crops, animals, or fowl, including the


production of:


a. fruits and vegetables of any kind,


b. meat, dairy, and poultry products,


c. nuts, tobacco, nursery, and floral products, and


d. products from silvicultural activity;


4. “Foreign adversary nation” means any foreign nation which


has been designated as a foreign adversary by the United States


Secretary of Commerce on the basis that its government has engaged


in a long-term pattern or serious instances of conduct significantly


adverse to the national security of the United States or security


and safety of the United States, as set forth in 15 C.F.R., Part 7.4


or such successor regulation, declaration, or statute;


5. “Military installation” means any facility owned or operated


by the United States Armed Forces that shelters military equipment


and personnel and facilitates training and operations for such


organizations as well as any outpost, facility, armory, or like


facility of the Oklahoma National Guard;


6. “Nonresident alien” means an individual who is not:


a. a citizen of the United States of America, or

Req. No. 1078 Page 2


b. a person lawfully admitted into the United States for


permanent residence pursuant to the federal


Immigration and Nationality Act. A person shall be


deemed lawfully admitted for permanent residence


regardless of whether the individual’s lawful


permanent resident status is conditional; and


7. “Residential property” means property intended to be used as


a dwelling, as such term is defined in the federal Fair Housing Act.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 129 of Title 60, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The following persons or entities shall not directly or


indirectly own, have a controlling interest in, acquire by purchase,


grant, devise, or descent any interest, or hold by lease, contract,


or usufruct, except a de minimus indirect interest, in agricultural


land in this state or in any real property in this state within five


(5) miles of a military installation:


1. A foreign adversary nation;


2. Any government official or agent of a foreign adversary


nation;


3. A partnership, an association, a corporation, an


organization, or any other combination of persons organized under


the laws of this state or having its principal place of business in


a foreign adversary nation, or a subsidiary of such entity;

Req. No. 1078 Page 3


4. Any person who is domiciled in a foreign adversary nation


and who is determined to be a nonresident alien; and


5. Any person, entity, or collection of persons or entities


described in paragraphs 1 through 4 of this subsection having a


controlling interest in a partnership, association, corporation,


organization, trust, or any other legal entity or subsidiary formed


for the purpose of owning real property in this state.


B. 1. Any person or entity in violation of the provisions of


subsection A of this section shall, within two (2) years following


the effective date of this act, fully divest from any holding or


interest in such property.


2. Notwithstanding the prohibitions of subsection A of this


section, a person or entity may acquire real property in this state


on or after the effective date of this act, by devise or descent,


through the enforcement of security interests, or through the


collection of debts, provided that the person or entity sells,


transfers, or otherwise divests itself of such real property within


two (2) years after acquiring such interest in the real property.


C. A person or entity is deemed to have a de minimus indirect


interest if any ownership is the result of the person’s or entity’s


ownership of registered equities in a publicly traded company owning


the land and if the person’s or entity’s ownership interest in the


company is either:



Req. No. 1078 Page 4


1. Less than five percent (5%) of any class of registered


equities or less than five percent (5%) in the aggregate in multiple


classes of registered equities; or


2. A noncontrolling interest in an entity controlled by a


company that is both registered with the United States Securities


and Exchange Commission as an investment adviser under the


Investment Advisors Act of 1940, as amended, and is not a foreign


entity.


D. Nothing in Subsection A of this section shall prohibit the


lease, purchase, or other acquisition of an interest in residential


property by a natural person.


E. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a corporation,


partnership, limited partnership, trustee, or other business entity


leasing land from its owner and using such land for agricultural


research and development or experimental purposes, including


testing, developing, or producing crop production inputs, including,


but not limited to, seeds, plants, pesticides, soil amendments,


biologicals, and fertilizers, for sale or resale to farmers.


F. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the free purchase,


sale, lease, or possession of real property in this state for


diplomatic purposes covered by the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic


Relations or by any individual who is:


1. A citizen of the United States;


2. A legal permanent resident of the United States;

Req. No. 1078 Page 5


3. An individual who has been granted asylum or other protected


status by the United States government; or


4. The spouse of a person listed in paragraphs 1 through 3 of


this subsection.


G. In consultation with the Oklahoma Department of Commerce,


the Governor may waive any purchase, acquisition, or holding of real


estate that might otherwise constitute a violation of this section


upon a finding by the Governor that the positive short-term and


long-term benefits of the purchase, acquisition, or holding to the


economy and people of this state outweighs the threat imposed by the


purchase, acquisition, or holding.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 130 of Title 60, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person or entity subject to the prohibitions in subsection


A of Section 2 of this act who owns, holds, leases, or controls a


prohibited interest in real property in this state as of the


effective date of this act shall register such property interest


with the Office of the Attorney General. The Office shall establish


a form for such registration which, at a minimum, shall include:


1. The name of the owner of the real property, as well as the


name or names of all entities having any lease, usufruct,


contractual, or other possessory interest authorizing use or


occupation of the property; and

Req. No. 1078 Page 6


2. The address of the real property, the property appraiser’s


parcel identification number, and the property’s legal description.


B. 1. The Office shall establish deadlines for registration


under subsection A of this section, with such deadlines being not


later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of this act.


2. A person or entity that fails to timely file a registration


with the Office shall be subject to a civil penalty of One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) for each day that the registration is late.


Such penalty may be enforced by the district attorney of the county


in which the property is located or by the Attorney General.


C. 1. At the time of purchase or of acquisition by means of


contract, lease, or other instrument, an entity or person acquiring


an interest in real property in this state shall provide an


affidavit signed under penalty of perjury attesting that the


acquisition is not prohibited by Section 2 of this act. A person or


entity required to make a report to the United States Department of


Agriculture under the AFIDA shall also file a copy of such report


with the Office of the Attorney General.


2. The failure to obtain or maintain the affidavit shall not:


a. affect the title or insurability of the title for the


real property, or


b. subject the closing agent to civil or criminal


liability, unless the closing agent has actual



Req. No. 1078 Page 7


knowledge that the transaction will result in a


violation of this section.


D. The Office of the Attorney General shall promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 130 of Title 60, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. If any real property is owned, held, leased, or acquired in


violation of this act, or if divestment of any interest does not


occur in the time period specified in subsection B of Section 2 of


this act, the real property shall be forfeited to the state.


B. The Attorney General and the district attorney of the county


in which the property is located shall have jurisdiction and may


initiate a civil action in the district court of the county in which


the property is located for the forfeiture of the real property or


any interest therein.


C. Upon filing such action, the district court shall record a


lis pendens in accordance with the laws of this state. The


defendant may at any time petition to modify or discharge lis


pendens based upon a finding that there is no probable cause to


believe that the real property or any portion thereof is owned or


held in violation of this act.


D. If the court finds that the real property, or any portion


thereof, is owned or held in violation of this section, the court

Req. No. 1078 Page 8


shall enter a final judgment of forfeiture vesting title to the real


property in this state, subject only to the rights and interests of


bona fide lienholders, and such final judgment relates back to the


date of the lis pendens.


E. The state, acting through the Attorney General or the


district attorney of the county in which the forfeited property is


located, may sell the property or the interest in the real property


subject to a final judgment of forfeiture. Any proceeds from the


sale shall first be paid to any lienholders of the property


interest, followed by the payment of any outstanding fines assessed


pursuant to this section, after which the Office of the Attorney


General shall be reimbursed for all costs related to the forfeiture


civil action and any costs related to the sale of the property


interest. Any remaining proceeds shall be paid to the holder of the


forfeited property interest.


F. At any time during the forfeiture proceeding, the Attorney


General or district attorney may seek an ex parte order of seizure


of the real property upon showing that the defendant’s control of


the real property constitutes a clear and present danger to the


state.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1078 RD 1/19/2025 5:45:56 AM



Req. No. 1078 Page 9